Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.161

Board—Powers and duties.

The board shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To establish by rule such minimum standards and procedures in the fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments as deemed appropriate and in the public interest;

(2) To adopt any other rules necessary to implement this chapter and which are not inconsistent with it;

(3) To develop, approve, and administer or supervise the administration of examinations to applicants for licensure under this chapter;

(4) To require a licensee or interim permit holder to make restitution to any individual injured by a violation of this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW, the uniform disciplinary act. The authority to require restitution does not limit the board's authority to take other action deemed appropriate and provided for in this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW;

(5) To pass upon the qualifications of applicants for licensure or interim permits and to certify to the secretary;

(6) To recommend requirements for continuing education and continuing competency requirements as a prerequisite to renewing a license or certification under this chapter;

(7) To keep an official record of all its proceedings. The record is evidence of all proceedings of the board that are set forth in this record;

(8) To adopt rules, if the board finds it appropriate, in response to questions put to it by professional health associations, hearing aid specialists, audiologists, speech-language pathologists, interim permit holders, and consumers in this state; and

(9) To adopt rules relating to standards of care relating to hearing aid specialists or audiologists, including the dispensing of hearing instruments, and relating to speech-language pathologists, including dispensing of communication devices.

[ 2014 c 189 s 13; 2010 c 65 s 4; 2002 c 310 s 16; 1998 c 142 s 11; 1996 c 200 s 20; 1993 c 313 s 7; 1987 c 150 s 23; 1983 c 39 s 13.]

NOTES:

Work group—2014 c 189: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.